Hawaii statutes.
§383-32 Filing of claim. Claims for
benefits shall be made in accordance with such regulations as the department of
labor and industrial relations may prescribe. [L 1939, c 219, §6(b); am L 1941,
c 304, §1, pt of subs 18; RL 1945, §4233; RL 1955, §93-31; am L Sp 1959 2d, c
1, §27; HRS §383-32]

Case Notes

Department is under no duty to maximize amount of benefits
that applicant is entitled to by alerting applicant to possible alternatives.
55 H. 250, 517 P.2d 773 (1973).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next